West Virginia, session 2025, SB241.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 1c. fair and equitable property valuation. §11-1C-5b. Exempting high tunnels and greenhouses from personal property taxation. (a) High tunnels, including but not limited to polytunnels or hoophouses; heated high tunnels; and both heated and non-heated greenhouses shall be exempt from personal property tax.(b) This article shall be effective from passage.